Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2304
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Commission means the Game and Parks Commission or its authorized agent;

(2) Department means the Department of Agriculture or its authorized agent;

(3) Director means the Director of Agriculture or his or her designee;

(4) Domesticated cervine animal has the same meaning as in section 54-2914; and

(5) Person means any individual, firm, group of individuals, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, unincorporated association, cooperative, or other entity, public or private.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB344, § 76.